Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.26, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Prohibition. A municipality may not issue a brewer taproom license to a brewer if the brewer seeking the license, or any person having an economic interest in the brewer seeking the license or exercising control over the brewer seeking the license, is a brewer that brews more than 250,000 barrels of malt liquor annually or a winery that produces more than deleted text begin 250,000deleted text end new text begin 750,000new text end gallons of wine annually.